Utah statutes.
54-17-103.   Rulemaking.
(1)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission:
(a)  shall make rules when required by this chapter; and
(b)  in addition to the rules required under Subsection (1)(a), may make rules
necessary for the implementation of this chapter.
(2)  Notwithstanding a requirement that the commission make rules, the
commission may take action under this chapter before the commission makes a
required rule including:
(a)  approving a solicitation process under Part 2, Solicitation Process;
(b)  approving a significant energy resource under Section 54-17-302;
(c)  issuing an order under Section 54-17-304 regarding whether an affected
electrical utility should proceed with implementing a significant energy
resource decision;
(d)  approving an energy resource under Section 54-17-402; or
(e)  issuing an order under Section 54-17-404 regarding whether an energy
utility should proceed with implementing a resource decision.
